District of Columbia statutes.
38-1969

Repealed

Assignment to service steps — method; promotions.

Repealed.

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 526, ch. 569, title IV, § 6
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1009, Pub. L. 85-838, § 1
Oct. 24, 1962, 76 Stat. 1233, Pub. L. 87-881, title I, § 101(5), (6)
Sept. 2, 1964, 78 Stat. 885, Pub. L. 78-885, title II, § 201(2)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 362, Pub. L. 91-297, title III,§ 302(6), (7)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1131.
1973 Ed., § 31-1531.